Utah statutes.
53-3-707.   Rights of party jurisdictions not affected by compact.
Except as expressly required by  the compact, nothing contained in this part
affects the right of any party jurisdiction to apply any of its other laws
relating to licenses to drive to any person or circumstance, or to invalidate
or prevent any driver license agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a party jurisdiction and a nonparty jurisdiction.
